tests/cases_plural.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Case back-vowel: а": 
    ат<n><pl><nom> : аттар
    ат<n><pl><acc> : аттары
    ат<n><pl><par> : аттарда
    ат<n><pl><dat> : аттарга
    ат<n><pl><abl> : аттартан
    ат<n><pl><ins> : аттарынан
    ат<n><pl><com> : аттардыын
    ат<n><pl><comp> : аттардааҕар

  "Case front-vowel: иэ": 
    дьиэ<n><pl><nom> : дьиэлэр
    дьиэ<n><pl><acc> : дьиэлэри
    дьиэ<n><pl><par> : дьиэлэрдэ
    дьиэ<n><pl><dat> : дьиэлэргэ
    дьиэ<n><pl><abl> : дьиэлэртэн
    дьиэ<n><pl><ins> : дьиэлэринэн
    дьиэ<n><pl><com> : дьиэлэрдиин
    дьиэ<n><pl><comp> : дьиэлэрдээҕэр

  "Case back-vowel: о": 
    ох<n><pl><nom> : охтор
    ох<n><pl><acc> : охтору
    ох<n><pl><par> : охтордо
    ох<n><pl><dat> : охторго
    ох<n><pl><abl> : охтортон
    ох<n><pl><ins> : охторунан
    ох<n><pl><com> : охтордуун
    ох<n><pl><comp> : охтордооҕор

  "Case front-vowel: үө":
    үөр<n><pl><nom> : үөрдэр
    үөр<n><pl><acc> : үөрдэри
    үөр<n><pl><par> : үөрдэрдэ
    үөр<n><pl><dat> : үөрдэргэ
    үөр<n><pl><abl> : үөрдэртэн
    үөр<n><pl><ins> : үөрлэринэн
    үөр<n><pl><com> : үөрдэрдиин
    үөр<n><pl><comp> : үөрдэрдээҕэр
